Washington statutes.
RCW 33.32.060

Restrictions on out-of-state savings and loan associations.

Subject to other provisions of this chapter, an out-of-state savings and loan association shall be permitted to establish a branch or acquire branches in this state if the out-of-state savings and loan association would be permitted to establish or acquire a branch in Washington state if it were a savings bank chartered under Title 32 RCW or a savings association chartered under this title.

[ 2013 c 76 s 31; 1945 c 235 s 85; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-204. Prior: 1933 c 183 s 88; 1890 p 56 s 13.]